Wyoming, session 2026, SF0104.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-16-2001 is created to read:

ARTICLE 20
FACULTY RESEARCH PROJECTS
SF0104

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0378

21-16-2001. Faculty research projects; incentives.

(a) The university faculty research project account
is created. All investment earnings from funds in the
account shall be credited to the account. Notwithstanding
9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) or 9-4-207, funds within the account
shall not lapse or revert. Funds within the account are
continuously appropriated to the university and shall
remain available for distribution as provided by this
section.

(b) The funds within the account created by
subsection (a) of this section shall be used to incentivize
and fund faculty research projects at the University of
Wyoming by providing funds for:

(i) Research projects where the acquisition of
enhanced research capabilities, including but not limited
to search engine and research database access, and
additional research-related equipment is necessary;

SF0104

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0378
(ii) Research projects that interest particular
donors who have provided matching funds as provided by
subsection (c) of this section and that coincide with the
mission of the university;

(iii) Research projects requested by Wyoming
businesses that fit the university's current research
strengths, regardless of whether the businesses provide
matching funds for the research;

(iv) Other miscellaneous research projects
specified by the university;

(v) Research stipends for graduate students
assisting with research projects funded, in whole or in
part, with the funds appropriated from the university
faculty research project account, where a graduate student
shall receive a research stipend of not more than one
thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00) per month in
addition to the graduate student's regular income. Funds
expended under this paragraph shall not require matching
funds.

SF0104

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0378
(c) Except as provided by paragraph (b)(v) of this
section, funds appropriated from the account shall only be
expended by the university as matching funds for research
projects under paragraphs (b)(i) through (iv) of this
section upon receipt of matching nonstate funds at the rate
of one dollar ($1.00) of appropriated funds for not less
than one dollar ($1.00) of matching nonstate funds from any
person.

(d) Unless the University of Wyoming negotiates an
explicit profit distribution model for a research project
with the faculty researcher or the university negotiates to
retain a percentage of ownership of any innovation or
patent right, the profits from research conducted at the
University of Wyoming, in whole or in part, with funds
appropriated from the university faculty research project
account, shall be distributed as follows:

(i) Fifty percent (50%) to the University of
Wyoming;

(ii) Fifty percent (50%) to the faculty
researcher.
SF0104

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0378

(e) For purposes of this section, "person" includes
an individual, partnership, corporation, joint stock
company or any other association or entity, excluding all
public entities.

(f) The University of Wyoming shall report to the
joint education interim committee, joint minerals, business
and economic development interim committee and the joint
appropriations committee not later than October 1, 2027 and
not less than annually thereafter on the number of research
projects funded in whole or in part by this section, the
subjects of the funded research and the amount of money
expended on each funded project. The University of Wyoming
shall also report on the number of graduate students who
received research stipends under paragraph (b)(v) of this
section and the amount of money expended on those stipends.

Section 2.

(a) There is appropriated fifty-one million two
hundred thousand dollars ($51,200,000.00) from the general
SF0104

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0378
fund to the university faculty research project account
created by this act.

(b) This appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose. This appropriation shall
not lapse or revert, notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008,
9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207. It is the intent of the
legislature that this appropriation be included in the
standard budget for the University of Wyoming for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

(c) The appropriation in subsection (a) of this
section shall not be deemed as part of the University of
Wyoming's state aid program as appropriated in the biennial
budget bill. Funds within the state aid program
appropriated to the university shall not be used to match
funds appropriated in subsection (a) of this section but
may be used for fundraising purposes to raise the necessary
matching funds.

SF0104

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0378
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0104